Wisconsin, session 2025, SB968.
do enact as follows:SB968,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB968,2,54(1) Home visitation program. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 1appropriation to the department of children and families under s. 20.437 (1) (ab), 2the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $500,000 to increase 3parental education on social media and its effects on children and parental 4education on healthy practices related to social media use under the home visitation 5program under s. 48.983.SB968,2,66